Wyoming, session 2025, HB0059.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-11-401(e)(vi)(intro) and by
creating a new subparagraph (H) is amended to read:

35-11-401. Compliance generally; exceptions.

HB0059

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0176
(e) The provisions of this article shall not apply to
any of the following activities:

(vi) Limited mining operations, whether
commercial or noncommercial, for the removal of sand,
gravel, scoria, limestone, dolomite, shale, ballast or
feldspar from an area of fifteen (15) acres or less of
affected land, excluding roads used to access the mining
operation, if the operator has written permission for the
operation from the owner and lessee, if any, of the
surface. The operator shall notify the land quality
division and the water quality division of the department
of environmental quality and the inspector of mines within
the department of workforce services of the location of the
land to be mined and the postal address of the operator at
least thirty (30) days before commencing operations. A copy
of the notice shall also be mailed to all surface owners
located within one (1) mile of the proposed boundary of the
limited mining operation at least thirty (30) days before
commencing operations. The operator shall notify the land
quality division of the department of environmental quality
of the date of commencement of limited mining operations
within thirty (30) days of commencing operations. Limited
HB0059

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0176
mining operations authorized under this paragraph are
subject to the following:

(H) The department may require water
quality testing before the operator commences limited
mining operations if the department determines or has
reason to believe that any domestic or drinking water
source may be impacted by the limited mining operations.
The administrator may require the operator to delay the
commencement of the limited mining operations for a
reasonable time in order to complete any water quality
testing required under this subparagraph.

Section 2. The environmental quality council, upon
recommendation by the department of environmental quality,
shall promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0059